Wisconsin, session 2025, SB333.
do enact as follows:SB333,13Section 1. 59.32 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,2,6459.32 (1) Sheriff; fees. The sheriff shall collect the fees prescribed in s. 5814.70, unless a higher fee is applicable under s. 814.705 (1) (a) or (2), and remit 6them to the treasurer as provided in s. 59.22 (1) (b).SB333,27Section 2. 814.59 of the statutes is created to read:SB333,2,108814.59 Definition. In this subchapter, “federal mileage rate” means the 9business standard mileage rate for the year as determined under 26 CFR 1.274-5 (j) 10(2).SB333,311Section 3. 814.595 of the statutes is created to read:SB333,3,912814.595 Annual fee adjustments. (1) Beginning in 2030 and every 5 years 1thereafter, the fee amounts under ss. 814.60 (1), 814.61 (1) (a) and (b), (3), (4), (5) 2(am), (6), (7) (a) and (b), (8) (am) 1. and 2., (9), (11), (12) (a) 1. and (c), and (13) to 3(14), 814.615 (1) (a) 2. and 3., 814.62 (1), (2), (3) (a), and (4), 814.63 (1) (b) and (2), 4814.65 (1), 814.66 (1) (a) 2., (b) 2., (c), (e) to (g), and (i) to (o) and (3), 814.67 (1) (a) 1. 5and 2., (am), (b) 1., and (bg), 814.68 (1) (a) and (2), 814.70 (1), (2), (3) (b), (7), (8), (9) 6(a), and (12), 814.72, 814.85 (1) (c), and 814.86 (1) for which a dollar amount is 7specified shall be adjusted to reflect any changes in the U.S. consumer price index 8for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by the U.S. department of 9labor, for the preceding 5-year period, rounded up to the nearest dollar.SB333,3,1210(2) The director of state courts shall adjust the changes in dollar amounts 11required under sub. (1) and post the adjusted fee amounts on the director of state 12court’s website.SB333,413Section 4. 814.60 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,3,1914814.60 (1) In a criminal action, the clerk of circuit court shall collect a fee of 15$163 $239 for all necessary filing, entering, or recording, to be paid by the defendant 16when judgment is entered against the defendant. Of the fees received by the clerk 17of circuit court under this subsection, the county treasurer shall pay 93.87 65 18percent to the secretary of administration for deposit in the general fund and shall 19retain the balance for the use of the county.SB333,520Section 5. 814.61 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,4,321814.61 (1) (a) Except as provided under pars. (c), (d), and (e), at the 22commencement of all civil actions and special proceedings not specified in ss. 814.62 23to 814.66, $75 $190. Of the fees received by the clerk under this paragraph, the 24county treasurer shall pay $45 to the secretary of administration for deposit in the 1general fund and shall retain the balance for the use of the county. The secretary of 2administration shall credit $15 of the $45 to the appropriation under s. 20.680 (2) 3(j).SB333,64Section 6. 814.61 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,4,85814.61 (1) (b) Except as provided in pars. (c), (d), and (e), in addition to the fee 6under par. (a), at the commencement of an action affecting the family, as defined in 7s. 767.001 (1), a fee of $20 $55 to be deposited by the county treasurer in a separate 8account to be used by the county exclusively for the purposes specified in s. 767.405.SB333,79Section 7. 814.61 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,4,1610814.61 (3) Third-party complaint. When any defendant files a 3rd-party 11complaint, the defendant shall pay a fee of $45 $114. The defendant shall pay only 12one such $45 fee in an action. Of the fees received by the clerk under this 13subsection, the county treasurer shall pay $25 to the secretary of administration for 14deposit in the general fund and shall retain the balance for the use of the county. 15The secretary of administration shall credit $5 of the $25 to the appropriation 16under s. 20.680 (2) (j).SB333,817Section 8. 814.61 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,4,2218814.61 (4) Jury fee. For a jury in all civil actions, except a garnishment 19action under ch. 812, a nonrefundable fee of $6 $17 per juror demanded to hear the 20case to be paid by the party demanding a jury within the time permitted to demand 21a jury trial. If the jury fee is not paid, no jury may be called in the action, and the 22action may be tried to the court without a jury.SB333,923Section 9. 814.61 (5) (am) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,4,2424814.61 (5) (am) (intro.) The clerk shall collect a fee of $5 $14 for the following:SB333,101Section 10. 814.61 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,5,32814.61 (6) Foreign judgments. On filing a foreign judgment under s. 3806.24, $15 $42.SB333,114Section 11. 814.61 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,5,135814.61 (7) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), upon the filing of any petition 6under s. 767.59 (1c) (a) or any motion, by either party, for the revision of a judgment 7or order in an action affecting the family, $30 $83. No fee may be collected under 8this paragraph for any petition or motion by either party for the revision of a 9judgment or order involving child support, family support, or maintenance if both 10parties have stipulated to the revision of the judgment or order. Of the fees received 11by the clerk under this paragraph, the county treasurer shall pay 50 20 percent to 12the secretary of administration for deposit in the general fund and shall retain the 13balance for the use of the county.SB333,1214Section 12. 814.61 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,5,2315814.61 (7) (b) Upon the filing of any petition, motion, or order to show cause by 16either party under s. 767.451 or 767.481, $50 $138. No fee may be collected under 17this paragraph for filing a petition, motion, or order to show cause for the revision of 18a judgment or order for legal custody or physical placement if both parties have 19stipulated to the revision of the judgment or order. Of the fees received by the clerk 20under this paragraph, the county treasurer shall pay 25 percent to the secretary of 21administration for deposit in the general fund, retain 25 percent for the use of the 22county, and deposit 50 percent in a separate account to be used by the county 23exclusively for the purposes specified in s. 767.405.SB333,1324Section 13. 814.61 (8) (am) 1. and 2. of the statutes are amended to read:SB333,6,21814.61 (8) (am) 1. If the appeal or review is by certiorari or on the record, $40 2$101.SB333,6,332. If a new trial is authorized and requested, $55 $140.SB333,144Section 14. 814.61 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,6,85814.61 (9) Transmitting documents. For certifying and transmitting 6documents upon appeal, writ of error, change of venue, for enforcing real estate 7judgments in other counties, or for enforcing judgments in other states, $15 $42 8plus postage.SB333,159Section 15. 814.61 (11) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,6,1310814.61 (11) Searches. For searching files or records to locate any one action 11when the person requesting the search does not furnish the case number of the 12action, or to ascertain the existence or nonexistence of any instrument or record in 13the custody of the clerk of circuit court, $5 $14.SB333,1614Section 16. 814.61 (12) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,6,1915814.61 (12) (a) 1. For receiving a trust fund, or handling or depositing money 16under s. 757.25 or 807.10 (3), at the time the money is deposited with the clerk, a fee 17of $10 $35 or 0.5 percent of the amount deposited, whichever is greater. In addition, 18a fee of $10 $35 shall be charged upon each withdrawal of any or all of the money 19deposited with the clerk.SB333,1720Section 17. 814.61 (12) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,7,221814.61 (12) (c) Deposits in contempt proceedings. For receiving and disbursing 22deposits made under s. 818.12 in contempt proceedings under ch. 785, $10 $25 per 23deposit. The $10 fee shall be deducted from the deposit, unless the entire deposit is 1ordered returned to the defendant, before applying the deposit to the satisfaction of 2a judgment under s. 818.14.SB333,183Section 18. 814.61 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,7,94814.61 (13) Support or maintenance petition. For the cost of court 5services, whenever a person not receiving benefits under s. 49.148 or 49.155 or aid 6under s. 49.19, 49.46, 49.465, 49.468, 49.47, or 49.471 files a petition requesting 7child support, maintenance, or family support payments, $10 $29 in addition to any 8other fee required under this section. This subsection does not apply to a petition 9filed by the state or its delegate.SB333,1910Section 19. 814.61 (13m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,7,1311814.61 (13m) Petition for guardianship of a child. For filing a petition 12under s. 48.9795 (12), whether in a guardianship or temporary guardianship 13proceeding or to commence an independent action, $60 $124.SB333,2014Section 20. 814.61 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,7,1615814.61 (14) Petition for occupational license. On filing a petition for an 16occupational license under s. 343.10 (4), $40 $83.SB333,2117Section 21. 814.615 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB333,7,2018814.615 (1) (a) 2. For all mediation provided after the first session mediation 19described under subd. 1., a single fee of $200 $462, regardless of the number of 20mediation sessions held. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb333 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb333 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB333 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB333 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB333: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting